Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ST. PAUL ATHLETIC CLUB.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $4,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to Youthprise for energy efficiency improvements to the former St. Paul Athletic Club building. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this section, energy efficiency improvements include roof repair and replacement to support solar panels, LED lighting improvements, and design and engineering costs. new text end